Massachusetts, session 194th, H3580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 164 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “mitigation” the
following:-
“Non-emitting thermal energy,” thermal energy and associated infrastructure that
supplies heating, or heating and cooling, from fuel sources whose combustion does not emit
greenhouse gases as defined in section 1 of chapter 21N.
SECTION 2. Section 92 of said chapter 164, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following:-
The department may order a gas company to terminate natural gas service to a customer
where such proposal ensures that the affected customer retains continuous access to safe, reliable
and affordable thermal energy services. A company offering to provide non-emitting thermal
energy has satisfied the requirement to supply petitioner.
of 2

SECTION 3: Section 94 of Chapter 143 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following:
(s): In consultation with the department of energy resources, to develop requirements and
promulgate regulations as part of the 2027 update to the state building code, in addition to the
requirements of the latest International Energy Conservation Code, requiring all new space
cooling technologies installed in new or existing single-, two-, and three- family homes and any
other appropriate structure type to be capable of both heating and cooling and integrated with
any other heating system into a thermostat-controlled system to operate for heat when cost-
effective to do so.
of 2